Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1018
State-owned vehicles that are passenger cars;
intermediate or compact class or smaller; legislative intent.

(1) The Legislature hereby declares that the purpose and intent
of this section are to take positive steps to reduce the consumption of gasoline
in this state and to make the most efficient and economical use of the nation's
resources and the state's funds.

(2) After August 24, 1975, all state-owned vehicles that are passenger cars purchased,
leased, rented, or approved for purchase, lease, or rent by the bureau shall
be of the intermediate, compact, or subcompact class. Not less than fifty
percent of such state-owned vehicles shall be of the compact or subcompact
class unless the costs to operate and maintain such vehicles are not to the
advantage of the state or such requirement fails to meet the intent of sections
81-1008 to 81-1025. For purposes of this section, classes shall be as defined
by motor vehicle manufacturers.

Laws 1975, LB 474, § 4;

Laws 1981, LB 381, § 16;

Laws 1984, LB 933, § 14;

Laws 2012, LB779, § 8;

Laws 2014, LB974, § 7.